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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P 1222/15ThrottleMotorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The throttle control motor is operated by the engine ECU and it opens and closes the throttle valve.
The fully open condition of the throttle valve is detected by the diesel throttle position switch, which is
mounted on the throttle body.
If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle control motor.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

O h t ith ttl t l t i i t

SOpenorshort in throttlecontrolmotorcircuit
SOpenorshort indiesel throttlepositionswitchcircuit

P1222/15

Openorshort in throttlecontrolmotorcircuit SThrottlecontrolmotor
SThrottlevalve
SThrottledrive gear

Open or short in diesel throttle position switch circuit

S Throttle drive gear
SDiesel throttlebody
SDiesel throttlepositionswitch
SEngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester II. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the malfunction oc-
curred.

1 Check throttle control motor circuit.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect t he oscilloscope bet ween t er m inals LU+ A,

LU+B, LU−A, LU−B and E01 of the engine ECU.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check the waveform between terminals LU+A, LU+B, LU−A,
LU−B and E01 of the engine ECU when the engine is racing.
OK:

The correct waveforms are as shown.

OK Go to step 5.

NG

2 Check voltage of throttle control motor circuit.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the throttle control motor.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals 2 and 5 of the throttle
control motor connector and body ground.
OK:

Voltage:9 to 14 V

NG Check for open in harness and connector be-
tween EFI OR ECD relay and throttle control mo-
tor (See page IN−1 9) .

OK
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3 Check throttle control motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the throttlecontrolmotorconnector.
CHECK:
S Measure the resistancebetween terminals 1,3and2of

the throttle control motor.
S Measure the resistancebetween terminals4,6and5of

the throttle control motor.
OK:

Resistance: 18 t o 2 2 � at20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F)

NG Replace diesel throttle body assembly (See Pub
No.RM896E,pageED −1).

OK

4 Check for open and short in harness and connector between throttle control mo-
tor and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .
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5 Check diesel throttle position switch.

PREPARATION:
Disconnector the diesel throttle position switch.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between terminal of the diesel throttle
position switch.
OK:

Throttle Valve Position Diesel throttle position switch signal

Fully closed 10 k� or higher

Fully open Below 1 �

NG Replace diesel throttle body assembly (See Pub
No. RM896E, page ED−1).

OK

6 Check for open and short in harness and connector between diesel throttle posi-
tion switch and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

7 Check for open and short in harness and connector between diesel throttle posi-
tion switch and body ground (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


